District of Columbia statutes.
34-1440

Applicability.

(a)

The definitions added to § 34-1431 by D.C. Law 20-245 (“amendment act”) shall apply to District of Columbia Standard Offer Service wholesale supply contracts effective on or after June 1, 2015.

(b)

The definitions added by the amendment act shall apply after December 31, 2017, to renewable energy credits included in PJM’s Generator Attributes Tracking System that were or are generated by a facility that is certified by the commission as a Tier 1 energy source before April 30, 2015, and purchased by an electricity supplier pursuant to a contract executed before April 30, 2015.

History

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-340, § 11a
as added Apr. 30, 2015, D.C. Law 20-245, § 2(b), 62 DCR 1492